Utah statutes.
35A-8-2003.   Youth Character Organization Restricted Account -- Creation -- Interest.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Youth Character Organization Restricted Account."

(2)  The account shall be funded by:

(a)  contributions deposited into the account in accordance with Section 59-10-1317;

(b)  private contributions;

(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities; and

(d)  interest described in Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  The account shall earn interest.

(b)  Interest earned on the account shall be deposited into the account.

(4)  The division shall distribute money appropriated by the Legislature to the division from the restricted account as provided in Section 35A-8-2004.



Enacted by Chapter 338, 2013 General Session

